grammars/class.nouns.lexc
LEXICON IVNounBase
[IV.Noun]:bak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:balak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:balanda^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:balem^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bard^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bardngalng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:barlah^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:barlkbu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:barnangarra^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:barndad^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:barndorrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bende^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:beng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:berd^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:berl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:berle^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:berrekalk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bid^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bidbok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bidngalanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bidyaw^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:birrkbirrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bodme^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bolidj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bolk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bolkngeykimuk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bolkngeyyahwurd^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bonjdjek^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:borrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:boy^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bukkarn^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:bule^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:burddji^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:burrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dad^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dalk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dangwel^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dangwok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dayken^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:debi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dedj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dedjmim^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dedjnjenghmi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:denge^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dengeyayaw^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:diw^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djabarrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djaberle^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djakkorl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djakku^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djawurrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djawuy^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djen^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djikka^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djikkakurrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djinem^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djorlok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djorrh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djulng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djurle^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:djurrh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dolng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dowiken^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:doy^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dulk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dulkarre^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dulkdad^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dume^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:dung^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:durddu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:gorrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:ka^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kal^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kanem^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kanemdulk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kanemrurrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kanemrurrkkurlah^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kange^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:karlang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:karlewobe^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:karlkid^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:karndum^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:karre^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:karrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kawadj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kayalanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:keb^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kerlk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kerri^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kih^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kodbarre^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kodj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kodjke^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kodjkulu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kodjmurrng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kodjngol^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kom^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:komnud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kong^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:korn^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:koymud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kuk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kun^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kurdu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kurlah^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kurlba^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kurlk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kurlurrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kurra^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kurrng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:kurrngirn^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:mad^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:madj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:malng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:manem^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:manj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:marung^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:mayali^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:mayorrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:men^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:merlem^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:milh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:mim^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:mimday^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:mimkurlah^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:mimmud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:mimnalk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:mok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:mokurrkurr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:mud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:murlun^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:murrng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:ney^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:ngabek^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:ngad^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:ngarlbak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:ngarlk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:ngey^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:ngobarn^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:ngol^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:ngolek^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:ngoninj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:ngudj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:nguk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:ngurl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:njam^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:njilng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:nunj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:rak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:rayek^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:red^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:rerrng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:rodjbe^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:ronj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:rorre^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:rurrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:umeleng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:walirrng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:wanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:waral^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:wardde^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:warre^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:wel^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:wilk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:winjku^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:wirle^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:wobe^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:wok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:worr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:woybuk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:wurr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:yarl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:yid^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:yidme^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:yidmekanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:yil^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:yirrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[IV.Noun]:yirrke^ NominalSuffixes ;
